Wyoming, session 2026, HB0079.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 34-1-158(a)(intro) and by creating a
new subsection (g) is amended to read:

34-1-158. Prescriptive easement for water conveyance.

(a) A prescriptive easement for a water conveyance
may be established if a water user has used and maintained
HB0079

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0182
a water conveyance under a claim of right for a period of
not less than ten (10) years during which the use has been:

(g) In any action to enforce a prescriptive easement
established under this section or to challenge the
existence or exercise of a prescriptive easement asserted
under this section, the court may award reasonable attorney
fees and expert witness fees to the party who substantially
prevailed in the action.

Section 2. This act shall apply to any action brought
on or after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0079